Utah statutes.
78B-6-404.   Discretion to deny declaratory relief.

The court may refuse to render or enter a declaratory judgment or decree where a judgment or decree, if rendered or entered, would not terminate the uncertainty or controversy giving rise to the proceeding.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

